ko: 호환 가능한 오케스트라 현악기: 첼로; 더블베이스; 범용; 비올라; 바이올린; 기타
nl: Compatibel strijkinstrument: Cello; Contrabas; Universeel; Viola; Viool; Andere
th: เครื่องสายออร์เคสตราที่เข้ากันได้: เชลโล; ดับเบิลเบส; อเนกประสงค์; วิโอลา; ไวโอลิน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 兼容管弦乐器: 大提琴; 低音提琴; 通用; 中提琴; 小提琴; 其他
el: Συμβατό ορχηστρικό έγχορδο όργανο: Τσέλο; Διπλό μπάσο; Universal; Βιόλα; Βιολί; Άλλο
pt-PT: Instrumento de cordas para orquestra compatível: Violoncelo; Contrabaixo; Universal; Viola; Violino; Outro
pl: Kompatybilny orkiestrowy instrument smyczkowy: Wiolonczela; Kontrabas; Uniwersalny; Altówka; Skrzypce; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilno orkestralno žičano glazbalo: Violončelo; Kontrabas; Univerzalna; Viola; Violina; Ostalo
es: Instrumento de cuerda de orquesta compatible: Violonchelo; Contrabajo; Universal; Viola; Violín; Otros
it: Strumento ad arco compatibile: Violoncello; Contrabbasso; Universale; Viola; Violino; Altro
ru: Совместимый оркестровый струнный инструмент: Виолончель; Контрабас; Универсальный; Виола; Скрипка; Другое
sk-SK: Kompatibilný orchestrálny sláčikový nástroj: Cello; Kontrabas; Univerzálny; Viola; Husle; Iné
lt-LT: Suderinamas orkestrinis styginis instrumentas: Violončelė; Kontrabosas; Universalus; Altas; Smuikas; Kita
hu: Kompatibilis zenekari húros hangszer: Cselló; Nagybőgő; Általános; Brácsa; Hegedű; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibelt orkesterstrenginstrumenter: Cello; Kontrabass; Universal; Viola; Fiolin; Annet
da: Kompatibelt orkesterstrengeinstrument: Cello; Kontrabas; Universal; Viola; Violin; Andet
ja: 使用可能なオーケストラ弦楽器: チェロ; コントラバス; ユニバーサル; ビオラ; ヴァイオリン; その他
de: Kompatibles Orchester-Saiteninstrument: Cello; Kontrabass; Universell; Bratsche; Geige; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 相容的管弦樂器: 大提琴; 低音提琴; 通用; 中提琴; 小提琴; 其他
fr: Instrument à cordes d’orchestre compatible: Violoncelle; Contrebasse; Universel; Viola; Violon; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим оркестров струнен инструмент: Виолончело; Контрабас; Универсален; Виола; Цигулка; Други
tr: Uyumlu orkestra yaylı çalgı: Çello; Kontrbas; Her türden mekana uygun; Viola; Keman; Diğer
cs: Kompatibilní koncertní smyčcový nástroj: Violoncello; Kontrabas; Univerzální; Viola; Housle; Jiné
en: Compatible orchestral string instrument: Cello; Double bass; Universal; Viola; Violin; Other
fi: Yhteensopiva orkesterijousisoitin: Sello; Kontrabasso; Yleinen; Alttoviulu; Viulu; Muu
sl-SI: Združljiva godala za orkester: Violončelo; Kontrabas; Univerzalno; Viola; Violina; Drugo
ro-RO: Instrument cu coarde compatibil: Violoncel; Contrabas; Universală; Violă; Vioară; Altele
vi: Nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc tương thích: Đàn cello; Đàn double bass; Phổ biến; Đàn viola; Đàn violin; Khác
pt-BR: Instrumento de cordas de orquestra compatível: Violoncelo; Contrabaixo; Universal; Viola; Violino; Outro
sv: Kompatibelt orkesterstränginstrument: Cello; Kontrabas; Universell; Viola; Violin; Övrigt